Washington statutes.
RCW 36.73.060

Authority to levy property tax.

(1) A district may levy an ad valorem property tax in excess of the one percent limitation upon the property within the district for a one-year period whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

(2) A district may provide for the retirement of voter-approved general obligation bonds, issued for capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem property tax levies in excess of the one percent limitation whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

[ 2005 c 336 s 6; 1987 c 327 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 336: See note following RCW 36.73.015.